Maryland, session 2026, HB0539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0539*

HOUSE BILL 539
9.5–404.
(a) The State Board shall adopt rules and regulations for licensing and operating
child care centers.
(b) These rules and regulations shall:
(13) Subject to subsection [(c)] (D) of this section, establish probationary
employment qualifications for an individual who is applying for the first time to be a child
care teacher in a child care center in the State that serves preschool or school–age children
who are at least 3 years old.
(C) (1) THESE RULES AND REGULATIONS SHALL PROVIDE A PATHWAY
FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS QUALIFIED TO BE A CHILD CARE TEACHER, BUT LACKS
PROOF OF NECESSARY EDUCATIONAL ATTAINMENT, TO ATTEST TO THE QUALIFYING
EDUCATIONAL CREDENTIALS HELD BY THE INDIVIDUAL.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBSECTION.
[(c)] (D) (1) The probationary employment qualifications established under
subsection (b)(13) of this section shall allow an individual to be employed as a child care
teacher during a probationary period if the individual:
(i) 1. Is enrolled in approved pre–service training;
2. Successfully completes the required 90 hours of the
approved pre–service training within 6 months after being hired; and
3. Holds an associate degree or a bachelor’s degree in:
A. Early childhood education;
B. Elementary education;
C. Child development;
D. Home economics;
E. Nursing;
F. Social work;
G. Special education; or
H. A related field approved by the Department; or

HOUSE BILL 539 3
(ii) 1. Is enrolled in approved pre–service training;
2. Has successfully completed at least 45 hours of the
approved pre–service training at the time the child care center hires the individual;
3. Successfully completes the remaining hours of the
pre–service training within 6 months after being hired; and
4. Holds an associate degree or a bachelor’s degree in a field
other than a field listed under item (i)3 of this paragraph.
(2) If, at the end of the 6–month probationary period, an individual
described in paragraph (1) of this subsection has not completed the required pre–service
training, the child care center shall, with no further cause, terminate the individual or
reassign the individual to a nonteaching position.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.